Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-233
Migratory game birds, defined.

Migratory game birds means all doves, ducks, geese, rails, snipes, cranes, woodcocks, coots, and swans.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 43.